Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 5. Law Library

§ 5-2-501.
Expenditures.

The judges of the supreme
court shall superintend and direct all expenditures of money for the
law library.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, § 9; 1955, ch. 193, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-201; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-921; Laws 1980, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 5-2-502.
Session law exchange.

Upon request, the state
law librarian
may send to the library
of each state and territory of the United States, free of expense,
one (1) copy of the session laws of this state in exchange for the
laws of the requesting state or territory. All the laws received in
the exchange shall be deposited by the state law librarian in the
state law library and become the property of this state.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 210, § 1; 2013 ch. 6, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to distribution of session laws in general, see §

8-2-101

.

The 2013 amendment

,
effective July 1, 2013, substituted “may” for “shall” after “librarian”.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 210, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.